02_Morphology/morphemes mayan.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
%<v%> !tzʼät
%<tv%> 
%<perf%> !x
%> !Morpheme Boundary

%<o_sg1%> !me 
%<o_sg2%> !you
%<o_sg3%> !he/she/it
%<o_pl1%> !us
%<o_pl2%> !you lot
%<o_pl3%> !them

%<s_sg1%> !I 
%<s_sg2%> !You
%<s_sg3%> !He/She/It
%<s_pl1%> !We
%<s_pl2%> !You lot
%<s_pl3%> !They

LEXICON Root
Object;

LEXICON StemVerb
%<v%>:%>tzʼät #;

LEXICON Object
xa:xa SubjectYou; !you
xix:xix SubjectYouLot; !you lot
xi:xi SubjectMe; !me
xoj:xoj SubjectUs; !us
x:x SubjectHe; !he/she/it
xe:xe SubjectThem; !them

LEXICON SubjectYou
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb; !They
%<s_sg1%>:nu StemVerb; !I
%<s_sg3%>:ru StemVerb; !He/She
%<s_pl1%>:qa StemVerb; !We

LEXICON SubjectYouLot 
%<s_sg3%>:ru StemVerb;
%<s_pl1%>:qa StemVerb;
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb;

LEXICON SubjectHim 
%<s_sg1%>:nu StemVerb; !I
%<s_sg2%>:a StemVerb; !you
%<s_pl2%>:i StemVerb; !You lot
%<s_pl1%>:qa StemVerb; !We
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb; !They

LEXICON SubjectUs
%<s_sg2%>:a StemVerb;
%<s_sg3%>:tu StemVerb;
%<s_pl2%>:'i StemVerb;
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb;

LEXICON SubjectMe 
%<s_sg2%>:na StemVerb;
%<s_sg3%>:ru StemVerb;
%<s_pl2%>:ni StemVerb;
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb;

LEXICON SubjectThem 
%<s_sg1%>:nu StemVerb;
%<s_sg2%>:a StemVerb;
%<s_sg3%>:ru StemVerb;
%<s_pl1%>:qa StemVerb;
%<s_pl2%>:'i StemVerb;
%<s_pl3%>:ki StemVerb;
